lt-LT: Galiuko dizainas: Bukas; Smailas; Kita
sv: Spetsdesign: Trubbig; Syrlig; Övrigt
sk-SK: Dizajn hrotu: Tupý; Ostrý; Iné
nl: Puntontwerp: Stomp; Zuur; Andere
el: Σχεδιασμός αιχμής: Αμβλύς; Ξινός; Άλλο
tr: Nokta Tasarımı: Kör; Keskin; Diğer
de: Nadelspitzendesign: Stumpf; Scharf; Sonstiges
da: Punktdesign: Sløv; Skarp; Andet
es: Diseño de punta: Romo; Ácido; Otros
ja: ポイントデザイン: 丸い; シャープ; その他
hu: Hegy kialakítása: Tompa; Éles; Egyéb
th: การออกแบบจุด: ทู่; ฝาด; อื่นๆ
fr: Design du point: Émoussé; Tranchante; Autre
hr-HR: Dizajn vrha: Tupi; Oštri; Ostalo
sl-SI: Zasnova konice: Topa; Ostra; Drugo
vi: Thiết kế điểm: Góc tù; Chát; Khác
en: Point design: Blunt; Sharp; Other
ro-RO: Designul vârfului: Bont; Ascuțit; Altele
fi: Pistesuunnittelu: Tylsä; Sharp; Muu
cs: Tvar hrotu: Tupý; Ostrý; Jiné
ru: Конструкция кончика: Тупой; Острый; Другой
pt-PT: Design da ponta: Rombo; Acentuado; Outro
pl: Projekt punktu: Tępy; Ostry; Inne
nb: Punktdesign: Sløv; Skarp; Annet
zh-CN: 尖点设计: 钝的; 尖酸; 其他
it: Forma della puntina: Arrotondato; Forte; Altro
ko: 포인트 디자인: 뭉툭한; 샤프; 기타
bg-BG: Точков дизайн: Тъп; Остър; Други
zh-TW: 針頭設計: 鈍; 明亮酸度; 其他
pt-BR: Formato do ponto: Ponta cega; Ácida; Outro